Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.200

Klickitat county.

Klickitat county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Commencing at a point in the midchannel of the Columbia river opposite the mouth of the White Salmon river; thence up the channel of the White Salmon river as far north as the southern boundary of township four north, range ten east of Willamette Meridian; thence due west on the township line to range nine east of Willamette Meridian; thence north following said range line to where it intersects the south boundary of Yakima county projected; thence east along the north boundary of township six north until that line intersects the range line between range twenty-three east and range twenty-four east; thence south along such range line to the Columbia river; thence down the Columbia river, midchannel, to the place of beginning.

[ 1905 c 89 s 1; 1 H.C. s17; 1881 p 187 s 1; 1873 p 571 s 1; 1869 p 296 s 1; 1868 p 60 s 1; 1867 p 49 s 1; 1861 p 59 s 1; 1859 p 420 s 1; RRS s 3944.]